Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8308
Facilities not previously licensed; credentialing; when.

Credentialing of categories of facilities not previously licensed should occur only when:

(1) Credentialing is necessary to prevent harm or endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare and the potential for the harm or endangerment is easily recognizable and not remote or dependent upon tenuous argument;

(2) Credentialing would not significantly diminish the supply of qualified providers or would not otherwise diminish the public's access to needed services; and

(3) There is no more cost-effective means of protecting the public from harm than credentialing.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 114.